California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 which a violation of this section occurs, the containers seized shall be condemned and destroyed or released upon any conditions that the court may impose to ensure against their use in violation of this chapter. The contents of any condemned container shall be returned to the owner thereof if the owner furnishes proper facilities for the return. A proceeding under this section is a limited civil case if the value of the property in controversy is less than or equal to the maximum amount in controversy for a limited civil case under Section 85 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 544, Sec. 2.   (AB 2632)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12607.

Whenever a packaged commodity is offered for sale, exposed for sale or sold without a statement of net quantity appearing thereon as required by this chapter, the sealer shall in writing order the commodity off sale and require that a correct statement of net quantity be placed on the commodity before the same may be released by the sealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

12609.

The secretary shall adopt necessary regulations to carry out the purpose of this division and for the testing of packages to verify the net quantity statements. In adopting these regulations, the secretary shall adopt by reference the packaging and labeling requirements recommended by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published in the current edition of the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130, Uniform Packaging and Labeling Regulations, except insofar as those requirements are specifically modified, amended, or rejected by regulation by the secretary. The regulations shall include exemptions from full compliance with this chapter for good and sufficient reasons. Any exemptions affecting consumer commodities shall be in
 conformance with exemptions permitted by federal regulations. Any regulation, or amendment thereof, shall be adopted by the secretary in conformity with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 30.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12610.

The secretary may promulgate regulations similar to those promulgated by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services or the Federal Trade Commission pursuant to the federal Fair Packaging and Labeling Act (Public Law 89-755; 80 Stat. 1296; 15 U.S.C. Secs. 1451-1461) effective to do the following:

(a) Establish and define standards for characterization
 of the size of a package enclosing any commodity, that may be used to supplement the label statement of net quantity of contents of packages containing such commodity, but this subdivision shall not be construed as authorizing any limitation on the size, shape, weight, dimensions, or number of packages which may be used to enclose any commodity.

(b) Require that the label on each package of a commodity (other than one that is a food within the meaning of Section 201(f) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act) bear the common or usual name of the consumer commodity, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 42.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12611.

It is unlawful to pack, ship, or sell any commodity in a container which does not conform to all the specifications of this chapter; or which is not conspicuously marked, branded, or otherwise labeled as required by this chapter; or on which any word, statement or other information required by this chapter is not prominently placed, in such terms and with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs or devices on the label or container, as to render it likely to be read and understood by ordinary persons under customary conditions of purchase and use.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

12612.

The sale of any commodity packaged in a container, wherein both the container and the contents thereof comply with any act of Congress or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder, appertaining to weight, measure or count, does not violate the provisions of this chapter; nor does the sale of malt beverages in containers complying with a rule, regulation or an approval of the United States Treasury Department, Internal Revenue Service or Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms, or of the State Department of Public Health and pertaining to weight, measure or count constitute a violation of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1033.)
-------------------------------------------

12613.

If any provision of this chapter is less stringent or requires information different from any requirement of Section 4 of the act of Congress entitled “Fair Packaging and Labeling Act” (P.L. 89-755; 80 Stat. 1296; 15 U.S.C. 1451-1461) or of any regulation promulgated pursuant to that act, the provision is inoperative to the extent that it is less stringent or requires information different from the federal requirement, in which event the federal requirement is a part of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

12615.5.

The violation of any provision of this chapter, except the provisions of Section 12604.5, is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1185.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Unit Pricing [12655. - 12656.]

12655.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the unit pricing of all canned, bottled, and packaged foods, packaged produce, and bakery goods; paper, plastic, wood, and metal products packaged in counts greater than 10; rolled paper, plastic, and metal products; canned, bottled, and packaged domestic, laundry and household cleansing, finishing, waxing, and polishing products; drug and first aid products canned, packaged, or bottled in counts greater than 10; and frozen fruits and vegetables, offered by merchants in their places of business for sale at retail to the public. The Legislature finds that unit pricing, the price per ounce, per pound, per gallon, or the metric equivalent thereof, or per 100 square feet, or per 100 count, for which those items are offered for sale at retail, effectively informs the consumer of the comparative prices and values of commodities, and is thus useful for the formulation of intelligent consumer choices. Reconstituted fluid ounce is the preferred unit of measure for unit pricing of powdered and concentrated infant formula.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1157, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12656.

The department, in cooperation with the retail food industry, shall adopt a standardized format for unit pricing that shall be available to a retailer upon request. The format shall include, but not be limited to, an identification of the item, including the brand name, the total price of the item, the volume, weight, or number of units of which the item is composed, and the price per unit. For infant formula, unit price information may be expressed based on the reconstituted volume.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1157, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Weighmasters [12700. - 12737.]

12700.

A weighmaster is any person who, for hire or otherwise, weighs, measures, or counts any commodity and issues a statement or memorandum of the weight, measure, or count which is used as the basis for either the purchase or sale of that commodity or charge for service.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12700.5.

(a) A weighmaster is not required to provide weighing services to the general public.

(b) Weighing for hire is at the discretion of the weighmaster.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12701.

The following persons are not weighmasters:

(a) Retailers weighing, measuring, or counting commodities for sale by them in retail stores in the presence of, and directly to, consumers.

(b) Except for persons subject to Section 12730, producers of agricultural commodities or livestock, who weigh commodities produced or purchased by them or by their producer neighbors, when no charge is made for the weighing, or when no signed or initialed statement or memorandum is issued of the weight upon which a purchase or sale of the commodity is based.

(c) Common carriers issuing bills of lading
 on which are recorded, for the purpose of computing transportation charges, the weights of commodities offered for transportation, including carriers of household goods when transporting shipments weighing less than 1,000 pounds.

(d) Milk samplers and weighers licensed pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 35161) of Chapter 12 of Part 1 of Division 15 of the Food and Agricultural Code, when performing the duties for which they are licensed.

(e) Persons who measure the amount of oil, gas, or other fuels for purposes of royalty computation and payment, or other operations of fuel and oil companies and their retail outlets.

(f) Newspaper publishers weighing or counting newspapers for sale to dealers or
 distributors.

(g) Textile maintenance establishments weighing, counting, or measuring any articles in connection with the business of those establishments.

(h) County sanitation districts operating pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4700) of Part 3 of Division 5 of the Health and Safety Code, garbage and refuse disposal districts operating pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 49100) of Part 8 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code, and solid waste facilities, as defined in Section 40194 of the Public Resources Code.

(i) Persons who purchase scrap metal or salvage materials pursuant to a nonprofit recycling program, or recycling centers certified pursuant to Division 12.1 (commencing with
 Section 14500) of the Public Resources Code that purchase empty beverage containers from the public for recycling.

(j) Pest control operators licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11701) of Division 6 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(k) Retailers, or recycling centers established solely for the redemption of empty beverage containers, as that phrase is defined in Section 14512 of the Public Resources Code, who are weighing, measuring, or counting salvage or returnable materials for purchase or redemption by them in retail stores, or, in the case of recycling centers, on the retail store premises or on a parking lot immediately adjacent to a retail store that is used for the purpose of parking by the store customers, directly from and in the presence of the
 seller. “Retailer” means an entity that derives 90 percent or more of its income from the sale of small quantities of food or nonfood items, or both, directly to consumers. “Salvage materials” means used paper products and used containers made of aluminum, tin, glass, or plastic.

(l) Any log scaler who performs log scaling functions, except weighing, as defined in the United States Forest Service Handbook, Supplement No. 4 of March 1987.

(m) Pawnbrokers licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 21300) of Division 8 of the Financial Code, and secondhand dealers licensed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625) of Chapter 9 of Division 8, when the pawnbroker or secondhand dealer weighs property that it acquires and reports the acquisition
 of the property pursuant to Section 21208 of the Financial Code or Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625) of Chapter 9 of Division 8, respectively.

(n) Facilities that handle medical waste and that report net weights, and not estimates, to the generator of the medical waste and the State Department of Public Health in accordance with the Medical Waste Management Act (Part 14 (commencing with Section 117600) of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code).

(o) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 61.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12702.

“Weighmaster,” when used without qualification, includes a deputy weighmaster.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12703.

Except as provided in Section 12701, no person shall perform any acts described in Section 12700, unless licensed as a weighmaster pursuant to this chapter and unless the current license fee and any penalty has been paid. The weighmaster shall forward to the department the name or names of deputy weighmasters with the appropriate fees required by Section 12704.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 297, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12703.1.

(a) In addition to any other requirements for issuance of a license pursuant to this chapter, if the applicant is a recycler or junk dealer as defined in Section 21601, the department shall require the applicant to furnish all of the following information accurately on any application for a new license or the renewal of a license issued pursuant to this chapter:

(1) A copy of the applicant’s current business license.

(2) A statement indicating that the applicant has either filed an application for a stormwater permit or is not required to obtain a stormwater permit.

(3) A statement indicating that the applicant has the equipment
 necessary to comply with the photographic and thumbprinting requirements for the purchase and sale of nonferrous materials pursuant to Section 21608.5 or a statement indicating that the applicant will not be purchasing or selling nonferrous materials and is not required to comply with Section 21608.5.

(4) A statement indicating that the applicant has requested to receive theft alert notifications pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 21608.7, unless that requirement does not apply pursuant to subdivision (b) of that section.

(5) The name or names of any deputy weighmasters.

(b) The department shall issue a license to a junk dealer or recycler upon receipt of an application for a new license or renewal of
 a license that contains the information required by subdivision (a) and that is accompanied by the appropriate fee.

(c) (1) The department shall make a thorough investigation of all the information contained in the application required by subdivision (a) within 90 days for a new license, and within one calendar year for a renewal of a license.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 12708, if the department determines that the information submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) is materially inaccurate, the department shall revoke the license issued to a junk dealer or recycler unless the junk dealer or recycler complies with the requirements of subdivision (a) within 14 days of notice from the department of a proposed revocation pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) A junk dealer or recycler whose license has been revoked pursuant to this subdivision is entitled to a hearing conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) The secretary may enter into a cooperative agreement with any county sealer to carry out the provisions of this section.

(e) This section shall not apply to a pawnbroker licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 21300) of Division 8 of the Financial Code and a secondhand dealer licensed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625) of Chapter 9 of Division 8.

(f) This section shall remain
 in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 33.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12704.

(a) A weighmaster shall pay to the department the following license fee for each license year as applicable to the operation:

(1) Seventy-five dollars ($75) if the weighmaster is operating at a fixed location.

(2) Thirty dollars ($30) for each additional fixed location at which the weighmaster is operating.

(3) Two hundred dollars ($200) if the weighmaster is operating at other than a fixed location.

(4) Twenty dollars ($20) for each deputy weighmaster.

(b) In addition to the license fees set forth in subdivision (a), a weighmaster who is a recycler or a junk dealer as defined in Section 21601 or is performing services on behalf of a recycler or junk dealer shall also pay to the department the following license fee for each license year as applicable to the operation:

(1) Five hundred dollars ($500) if the weighmaster is operating at a fixed location.

(2) Five hundred dollars ($500) for each additional fixed location at which the weighmaster is operating.

(3) Five hundred dollars ($500) if the weighmaster is operating at other than a fixed location.

(c) “License year” means the period of time beginning
 with the first day of the month the weighmaster is required to be licensed in this state, and ending on the date designated by the secretary for expiration of the license, or yearly intervals after the first renewal.

(d) “Location” means a premise on which weighing, measuring, or counting devices are used.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 392, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 34.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 35 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

12704.

(a) A weighmaster shall pay to the department the following license fee for each license year as applicable to the operation:

(1) Seventy-five dollars ($75) if the weighmaster is operating at a fixed location.

(2) Thirty dollars ($30) for each additional fixed location at which the weighmaster is operating.

(3) Two hundred dollars ($200) if the weighmaster is operating at other than a fixed location.

(4) Twenty dollars ($20) for each deputy weighmaster.

(b) “License year” means the period of time beginning with the first day of the month the weighmaster is required to be licensed in this state, and ending on the date designated by the secretary for expiration of the license, or yearly intervals after the first renewal.

(c) “Location” means a premise on which weighing, measuring, or counting devices are used.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 392, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 35.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12705.

Any change in the legal entity of a licensed weighmaster requires the new legal entity to obtain a weighmaster license before operating as a weighmaster.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12706.

(a) The secretary may assign or reassign dates for the expiration of licenses for any weighmaster.

(b) The secretary may establish a license year for any weighmaster consisting of any period from one month to 11 months, inclusive, with subsequent renewals being required at yearly intervals thereafter.

(c) Whenever the license year is less than 12 months by reason of the assignment or reassignment of the expiration date by the secretary, the license fee as designated in Section 12704 shall be decreased by one-twelfth of the annual fee for each month of the period less than 12 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 43.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12707.

Each license required by this chapter shall be renewed annually, on or before the first day of the first month of the licensee’s license year, by application to the secretary, accompanied by the annual license fee. An application and annual license fee sent by mail is not overdue if postmarked not later than the fifth day of the month in which it is due. To any fee not paid when due, there shall be added a penalty equal to 30 percent of the amount of the license fee, if it is paid within 30 days of becoming due. The penalty for a renewal fee more than 30 days after becoming due shall be 100 percent of the amount of the license fee. However, no penalty shall be applicable to the renewal of deputy weighmaster
 licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 62.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12708.

The secretary may refuse to grant any license provided for by this chapter, or may refuse to renew any license, and may revoke or suspend any license when, after a hearing conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the secretary is satisfied that the applicant or licensee is not qualified to capably or reliably perform the duties of a weighmaster or has otherwise been found guilty of a misdemeanor as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 44.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12709.

(a) All license fees collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to be expended by the department for the administration and enforcement of this chapter, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) License fees collected pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12704 shall be deposited in a special account in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to be expended by the department for the administration and enforcement of Section 12703.1.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 392, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 36.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 37 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

12709.

(a) All license fees collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to be expended by the department for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 392, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 37.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Section operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12710.

A weighmaster may employ or designate any person to act for the weighmaster as a deputy weighmaster and shall be responsible for all acts performed by that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 297, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12710.5.

(a) At any time during the license year, any weighmaster may replace deputies without payment of additional fees by forwarding to the department the name of any replacement deputy and replaced deputy.

(b) Any weighmaster who does not furnish to the department a deputy name as required by this section is guilty of an infraction, and, upon conviction, may be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(c) A weighmaster may increase the original number of deputies by submitting a new application accompanied by appropriate fees, for the additional number of deputy licenses requested, which shall expire on the date stated on the weighmaster license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 818, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12711.

A weighmaster shall issue a weighmaster certificate whenever payment for the commodity or service represented is dependent on a written or printed weight, measure, or count.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12712.

(a) A weighmaster certificate may be signed and issued by a weighmaster other than the weighmaster actually determining the weight, measure, or count of any commodity, if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The weighmaster issuing the certificate does so based on information received from the weighmaster who actually determined the weight, measure, or count and both are on the same principal license.

(2) The records and worksheets, signed by the weighmaster who actually weighed, measured, or counted the commodity, are maintained as a part of the weighmaster’s records in a manner so as to ensure their identity with the certificate issued.

(b) A weighmaster may transfer a weight, measure, or count appearing on a weighmaster certificate to another weighmaster certificate, if the original certificate number and name of the issuing weighmaster appear on the second certificate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12713.

(a) A weighmaster is responsible for ensuring that the weighmaster certificates issued by him or her, or a deputy acting for him or her, are complete and contain all the information required by Sections 12714, 12714.5, and 12715 that is applicable to each transaction.

(b) It is unlawful to issue, or cause to be issued, a weighmaster certificate if the certificate does not contain all the information required by Sections 12714, 12714.5, and 12715 for the commodity weighed, measured, or counted. The issuance of a receipt showing the weight, measure, or count of fish, mollusks, or crustaceans pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8010) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 6 of the Fish and Game Code constitutes the issuance of a weighmaster certificate under this chapter when issued by a person who is a weighmaster pursuant to Section 12700.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 405, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12714.

(a) There shall appear in an appropriate and conspicuous place on each certificate, and all copies thereof, the following legend: 
 
WEIGHMASTER CERTIFICATE

THIS IS TO CERTIFY that the following described commodity was weighed, measured, or counted by a weighmaster, whose signature is on this certificate, who is a recognized authority of accuracy, as prescribed by Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 12700) of Division 5 of the California Business and Professions Code, administered by the Division of Measurement Standards of the California Department of Food and Agriculture.

(b) There shall also appear on each certificate, and all copies thereof, the printed name of the principal weighmaster as it appears on the license.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12714.5.

All information contained on the certificate shall be clear and legible.

Each certificate shall be numbered consecutively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12715.

Each certificate shall provide for the following information as applicable to the transaction:

(a) The date on which the weight, measure, or count was determined.

(b) The street address or location description and the city or township where the weighing, measuring, or counting occurred.

(c) The complete signature of the weighmaster who determined each weight, measure, or count. The name of a weighmaster may be imprinted electronically on the weighmaster certificate in lieu of a handwritten signature, if the electronically imprinted name is that of the weighmaster who weighed, measured, or counted the commodity or that of another weighmaster pursuant to Section 12712.

(d) The kind of commodity and any other information that may be necessary to identify the product or distinguish it from a similar commodity.

(e) The number of units of the commodity. If not personally determined by a weighmaster, the certificate shall contain the words “driver’s count” or “loader’s count,” as appropriate, after the number of commodity units. The abbreviation “D.C.” or “L.C.” may be used in lieu of the complete words.

(f) The name of the owner, or his or her agent, and the consignee. If the transaction involves hay or hay products, the name and address of the grower, and his or her agent, as provided by the driver of the vehicle.

(g) At least one of the following:

(1) The gross weight of the commodity and the vehicle or container, if only the gross weight was determined.

(2) The tare weight of the unladen vehicle or container, if only the tare weight was determined.

(3) The gross, tare, and net weights when a gross and tare are used in determining the net weight.

(4) The true net weight, measure, or count when no gross and tare weights are involved in determining the net quantity of the product.

(h) The tare weights, and the code identification or description of boxes, bins, pallets, or other containers.

(i) The correct identification of the vehicle, combination of vehicles, or other means by which the commodity was delivered. If an equipment number is used to identify a vehicle or combination of vehicles, there shall be traceability to the registered vehicle license numbers through the weighmaster’s records.

(j) The unit of measure, such as pounds, tons, gallons, kilograms, or cubic yards, used to identify the quantity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 203, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12716.

All weighmasters shall keep and preserve, as records, for a period of four years, all copies of voided certificates, records, and worksheets required by this chapter and true copies of all weighmaster certificates issued. These records shall, at all times, be open for inspection by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 63.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12716.5.

A certificate on which a weight, measure, or count error is discovered after issuance shall be corrected by issuing a correction certificate to all parties who were issued the original certificate.

The word “INCORRECT” shall be written across the face of the original certificate. The original certificate number and reason for the correction shall be recorded on the correction certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12717.

Any weighing, measuring, or counting instrument or device, as defined in Section 12500, which is used by a weighmaster and for which specifications and tolerances have been adopted by the secretary, shall be approved, tested, and sealed in accordance with this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 64.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12718.

Any person who does any of the following acts is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(a) Requests any person to weigh, measure, or count any commodity falsely or incorrectly.

(b) Requests a false or incorrect weighmaster certificate.

(c) Furnishes or gives false information to a weighmaster for use in the completion of a weighmaster certificate.

(d) Knowingly presents for payment a false weighmaster certificate.

(e) Knowingly issues a weighmaster certificate giving thereon a false weight, measure, or count.

(f) Alters a weighmaster certificate resulting in giving thereon a false weight, measure, or count.

(g) Possesses unfilled or unused weighmaster certificate forms, if he or she is not a weighmaster.

(h) Issues a weighmaster certificate that contains alterations or omissions of gross or tare weights, net only weights, or measurements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 297, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12718.5.

Subdivision (g) of Section 12718 does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Persons engaged in the business of printing, distributing, or selling weighmaster certificate forms.

(b) Persons possessing or transporting combination grade and weight certificates to be used by employees of marketing order boards or grading inspection services of either the department or the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12719.

When the weight or measure of a vehicle, container, or pallet and its net contents has been recorded on a weighmaster certificate, it is unlawful for any person to remove a part of, or add to, the net contents, before the contents are delivered to the buyer or consignee, unless a correct weighmaster certificate is obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12720.

When the tare weight of a vehicle or the weight of the vehicle and its contents have been recorded on a weighmaster certificate, it is unlawful for any person to alter the tare weight of the vehicle prior to the time that the net weight of the commodity has been determined and recorded on the certificate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12721.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the vehicle, container, pallet, or commodity for which the weight, measure, or count is being certified shall actually be weighed, measured, or counted at the time of, and for the purpose of, each certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 405, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12722.

(a) In accordance with this chapter and regulations adopted by the secretary, any weighmaster may use a tare weight for a vehicle, container, or pallet that has been previously determined by a weighmaster. It is the responsibility of the party for whom the tare weight was established to maintain the tare weight within the variations prescribed by the secretary.

(b) Any weighmaster weighing any vehicle moving earth, stone, rock, sand, gravel, or asphalt paving material may use a predetermined tare weight. The issuance of predetermined tare weights are exempt from the provisions of Division 9 (commencing with Section 4000) of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations. It is the
 responsibility of the party for whom the tare weight was established to maintain the actual weight so that the actual tare weight of the vehicle shall at no time exceed the recorded tare weight.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 65.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12723.

The secretary shall adopt regulations for the establishment of vehicle, container, and pallet tares, including, but not limited to, the adoption of conditions of use, certificate requirements, sample size, allowable variations, and procedure to be used to verify common tares.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 46.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12724.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a weighmaster weighing a vehicle for certification shall determine both gross and tare weights with all persons off the scale and vehicle, unless both the gross and tare weights are determined without leaving the weighing location.

(b) Predetermined tares for vehicles moving earth, stone, rock, sand, gravel, and asphalt paving material may be determined with the driver in the vehicle, if the gross weight is determined in the same manner and the weighmaster indicates on the weighmaster certificate that the driver was on the vehicle for both gross and tare weight.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12725.

A weighmaster shall not certify to the gross weight of a vehicle if all of the following conditions prevail:

(a) The scale is located at the site where the vehicle is loaded.

(b) The vehicle is weighed before entering a highway.

(c) The vehicle’s gross weight exceeds 80,000 pounds, or exceeds 82,000 pounds if the vehicle is a near-zero-emission or zero-emission vehicle as defined in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 44258 of the Health and Safety Code, unless a special permit authorizing a greater gross weight for the vehicle has been issued pursuant to Section 35780 of the Vehicle
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 2061)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12726.

(a) If doubt or differences arise as to the accuracy of the weight, measure, or count of any amount or part of any commodity, unladen vehicle, or container for which a weighmaster certificate has been issued, a person having a financial interest may, upon complaint to the department, have the amount, or part thereof, verified by the department or a weighmaster designated by it, upon depositing a sufficient sum of money with the department to defray the actual cost of the verification.

(b) If, when verified, a difference from the original certified weight, measure, or count is discovered as the result of fraud, carelessness, or faulty apparatus, the cost of the verification shall be borne by the weighmaster responsible for the issuance of the erroneous certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 297, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12727.

The secretary may, at any time, require a vehicle to proceed to the nearest vehicle scale for the purpose of weight verification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 47.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12728.

(a) No weighmaster shall weigh a vehicle, or combination of vehicles, for certification, when part of the vehicle, or connected combination, is not resting on the scale.

(b) When weighing a combination of vehicles that will not rest on the scale platform at one time, the combination shall be disconnected and weighed separately. The weights so taken may be combined for the purpose of issuing a single certificate.

(c) This section does not prohibit weighing of vehicles to determine compliance with the Vehicle Code.

(d) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) The weighing of seed cotton for purposes of ginning when the weights are obtained by weighing trailers not equipped with braking systems and are not used for the sale of the seed cotton.

(2) Multiple draft or in-motion weighing operations that comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 12107.

(3) A combination of multiple railcars that contain grain or grain products if the consignor and the consignee to the transaction agree in writing to a multiple draft weighing operation.
